targa/proprietary/es_ES.aff
# Portions of this file are:
# Copyright (C) 2010-20011 Motorola, Inc. All Rights Reserved.

SET ISO8859-1

TRY aeroinsctldumpbgfvhzóíjáqéñxyúükwAEROINSCTLDUMPBGFVHZÓÍJÁQÉÑXYÚÜKW

# BEGIN Motorola, rwtn36, 29-Jan-2010, Feature 33267
NOSPLITSUGS
MAXNGRAMSUGS 0
# END Feature 33267

REP 20
REP ás az
REP az ás
REP cc x
REP és ez
REP ez és
REP güe hue
REP güi hui
REP hue güe
REP hui güi
REP ís iz
REP ío ido
REP ke que
REP ki qui
REP ll y
REP mb nv
REP nv mb
REP seci cesi
REP x cc
REP y ll
REP vámonos vayámonos

MAP 5
MAP aáA?MAP eéE?MAP iíI?MAP oóO?MAP uúüUÚÜ
PFX a Y 2
PFX a 0 a [^aeiou]
PFX a 0 an [aeiou]

PFX b Y 1
PFX b 0 ante .

PFX c Y 2
PFX c 0 anti [^r]
PFX c 0 antir r

PFX d Y 2
PFX d 0 auto [^r]
PFX d 0 autor r

PFX e Y 2
PFX e 0 bi [^r]
PFX e 0 bir r

PFX f Y 6
PFX f 0 con [^abehilopru]
PFX f 0 con ll
PFX f 0 com pb
PFX f 0 co [aehiou]
PFX f 0 co l[^l]
PFX f 0 cor r

PFX g Y 3
PFX g 0 de [^er]
PFX g 0 d e
PFX g 0 der r

PFX h Y 2
PFX h 0 des [^s]
PFX h 0 de s

PFX i Y 2
PFX i 0 em [bp]
PFX i 0 en [^bp]

PFX j Y 2
PFX j 0 entre [^r]
PFX j 0 entrer r

PFX k Y 4
PFX k 0 i l
PFX k 0 im [bp]
PFX k 0 in [^blpr]
PFX k 0 ir r

PFX l Y 1
PFX l 0 inter .

PFX m Y 2
PFX m 0 micro [^r]
PFX m 0 micror r

PFX n Y 3
PFX n 0 pr e
PFX n 0 pre [^er]
PFX n 0 prer r

PFX o Y 2
PFX o 0 pro [^r]
PFX o 0 pror r

PFX p Y 2
PFX p 0 r e
PFX p 0 re .

PFX q Y 3
PFX q 0 sem i
PFX q 0 semi [^ir]
PFX q 0 semir r

PFX r Y 3
PFX r 0 sobr e
PFX r 0 sobre [^r]
PFX r 0 sobrer r

PFX s Y 1
PFX s 0 sub .

PFX t Y 1
PFX t 0 super .

PFX u Y 8
PFX u e tran es
PFX u 0 tran s
PFX u 0 trans [^es]
PFX u e trans e[^s]
PFX u e tra es
PFX u 0 tra s
PFX u 0 tras [^es]
PFX u e tras e[^s]

SFX A Y 18
SFX A r ción ar
SFX A r ciones ar
SFX A er ición [^cn]er
SFX A er iciones [^cn]er
SFX A er ición [^e]cer
SFX A er iciones [^e]cer
SFX A ecer ición ecer
SFX A ecer iciones ecer
SFX A er ición [^o]ner
SFX A er iciones [^o]ner
SFX A ner sición oner
SFX A ner siciones oner
SFX A r ción [^c]ir
SFX A r ciones [^c]ir
SFX A r ción [^u]cir
SFX A r ciones [^u]cir
SFX A ir ción ucir
SFX A ir ciones ucir

SFX B Y 6
SFX B r dura [aií]r
SFX B r duras [aií]r
SFX B r dura [^s]er
SFX B r duras [^s]er
SFX B er idura ser
SFX B er iduras ser

SFX C Y 14
SFX C r je ar
SFX C r jes ar
SFX C 0 je a
SFX C 0 jes a
SFX C 0 aje [^aei]r
SFX C 0 ajes [^aei]r
SFX C 0 aje l
SFX C 0 ajes l
SFX C e aje e
SFX C e ajes e
SFX C ón onaje ón
SFX C ón onajes ón
SFX C o aje o
SFX C o ajes o

SFX F Y 6
SFX F te cia ante
SFX F te cias ante
SFX F te cia [^i]ente
SFX F te cias [^i]ente
SFX F iente encia iente
SFX F iente encias iente

SFX H Y 14
SFX H 0 zo a
SFX H 0 zos a
SFX H e azo [^u]e
SFX H e azos [^u]e
SFX H que cazo que
SFX H que cazos que
SFX H o azo o
SFX H o azos o
SFX H 0 azo [lr]
SFX H 0 azos [lr]
SFX H ín inazo ín
SFX H ín inazos ín
SFX H ón onazo ón
SFX H ón onazos ón

SFX J Y 2
SFX J le ilidad ble
SFX J le ilidades ble

SFX K Y 26
SFX K o idad [bdmnruvx]o
SFX K o idades [bdmnruvx]o
SFX K zo cedad [^ei]zo
SFX K zo cedades [^ei]zo
SFX K z cidad z
SFX K z cidades z
SFX K zo cidad [ei]zo
SFX K zo cidades [ei]zo
SFX K e icidad le
SFX K e icidades le
SFX K o edad [fhij]o
SFX K o edades [fhij]o
SFX K ío iedad ío
SFX K ío iedades ío
SFX K 0 idad [lr]
SFX K 0 idades [lr]
SFX K e idad [mnru]e
SFX K e idades [mnru]e
SFX K 0 dad [pv]e
SFX K 0 dades [pv]e
SFX K o edad lso
SFX K o edades lso
SFX K o idad [^l]so
SFX K o idades [^l]so
SFX K co quedad co
SFX K co quedades co

SFX L Y 34
SFX L o ía ero
SFX L o ías ero
SFX L o ería [bdhjlnñpst]o
SFX L o erías [bdhjlnñpst]o
SFX L o ería [^e]ro
SFX L o erías [^e]ro
SFX L za cería za
SFX L za cerías za
SFX L zo cería zo
SFX L zo cerías zo
SFX L z cería z
SFX L z cerías z
SFX L a ía era
SFX L a ías era
SFX L a ería [djlpsty]a
SFX L a erías [djlpsty]a
SFX L a ería [^e]ra
SFX L a erías [^e]ra
SFX L ío ería ío
SFX L ío erías ío
SFX L 0 ía er
SFX L 0 ías er
SFX L 0 ría [jr]e
SFX L 0 rías [jr]e
SFX L 0 ería l
SFX L 0 erías l
SFX L án anería án
SFX L án anerías án
SFX L ón onería ón
SFX L ón onerías ón
SFX L co quería co
SFX L co querías co
SFX L a uería ga
SFX L a uerías ga

SFX M Y 40
SFX M zo cez zo
SFX M zo ceces zo
SFX M 0 za [cdlmpr]e
SFX M 0 zas [cdlmpr]e
SFX M o ez [anou]do
SFX M o eces [anou]do
SFX M io ez dio
SFX M io eces dio
SFX M a ez a
SFX M a eces a
SFX M o ez [hsvy]o
SFX M o eces [hsvy]o
SFX M o ez rio
SFX M o eces rio
SFX M o eza [bp]io
SFX M o ezas [bp]io
SFX M 0 z [jt]e
SFX M 0 ces [jt]e
SFX M o ez ojo
SFX M o eces ojo
SFX M o eza [ai]jo
SFX M o ezas [ai]jo
SFX M 0 eza l
SFX M 0 ezas l
SFX M o eza [npr]o
SFX M o ezas [npr]o
SFX M o ez año
SFX M o eces año
SFX M o eza [eio]ño
SFX M o ezas [eio]ño
SFX M o ez [ai]to
SFX M o eces [ai]to
SFX M o eza nto
SFX M o ezas nto
SFX M o eza [aie]sto
SFX M o ezas [^u]sto
SFX M o ez usto
SFX M o eces usto
SFX M o uez go
SFX M o ueces go

SFX N Y 36
SFX N a illa [bdfhjlmnprstv]a
SFX N a illas [bdfhjlmnprstv]a
SFX N o illo [bdhjlmnprstv]o
SFX N o illos [bdhjlmnprstv]o
SFX N 0 cilla ve
SFX N 0 cillas ve
SFX N za cilla za
SFX N za cillas za
SFX N 0 ecilla d
SFX N 0 ecillas d
SFX N ón oncillo ón
SFX N án ancillo án
SFX N 0 cillo or
SFX N 0 cillos or
SFX N zo cillo zo
SFX N zo cillos zo
SFX N 0 cillo [djlnu]e
SFX N 0 cillos [djlnu]e
SFX N z cecillo z
SFX N z cecillos z
SFX N 0 ecillo ur
SFX N 0 ecillos ur
SFX N e illo [cpt]e
SFX N e illos [cpt]e
SFX N 0 illo [ls]
SFX N 0 illos [ls]
SFX N 0 illo [^ou]r
SFX N 0 illos [^ou]r
SFX N co quillo co
SFX N co quillos co
SFX N go guillo go
SFX N go guillos go
SFX N ca quilla ca
SFX N ca quillas ca
SFX N ga guilla ga
SFX N ga guillas ga

SFX O Y 18
SFX O ta mo ta
SFX O 0 ismo [dflnr]
SFX O o ismo [^i]co
SFX O o ismo [^o]ico
SFX O ico ísmo oico
SFX O a ismo [dt]a
SFX O o ísmo eo
SFX O e ismo [jrt]e
SFX O 0 ismo ln
SFX O án anismo án
SFX O ón onismo ón
SFX O o smo io
SFX O o ismo [rst]o
SFX O ía ismo ía
SFX O a smo ia
SFX O és esismo és
SFX O 0 mo is
SFX O o uismo go

SFX P Y 4
SFX P r miento [ai]r
SFX P r mientos [ai]r
SFX P er imiento er
SFX P er imientos er

SFX Q Y 40
SFX Q ar ión [lnsx]ar
SFX Q ar iones [lnsx]ar
SFX Q r ión [np]ir
SFX Q r iones [np]ir
SFX Q ar ón iar
SFX Q ar ones iar
SFX Q der sión der
SFX Q der siones der
SFX Q tir sión tir
SFX Q tir siones tir
SFX Q dir sión dir
SFX Q dir siones dir
SFX Q jar sión rjar
SFX Q jar siones rjar
SFX Q dar sión dar
SFX Q dar siones dar
SFX Q onar ón onar
SFX Q ar es onar
SFX Q decer sión decer
SFX Q decer siones decer
SFX Q ir sión uir
SFX Q ir siones uir
SFX Q ndir sión ndir
SFX Q ndir siones ndir
SFX Q er sión [eo]er
SFX Q er siones [eo]er
SFX Q tar sión otar
SFX Q tar siones otar
SFX Q gir sión gir
SFX Q gir siones gir
SFX Q cer sión rcer
SFX Q cer siones rcer
SFX Q rir stión rir
SFX Q rir stiones rir
SFX Q ctar xión ctar
SFX Q ctar xiones ctar
SFX Q car xión car
SFX Q car xiones car
SFX Q jar xión ejar
SFX Q jar xiones ejar

SFX R Y 197
SFX R r mos [aei]r
SFX R ar áis ar
SFX R r ba ar
SFX R r bas ar
SFX R ar ábamos ar
SFX R ar abais ar
SFX R r ban ar
SFX R ar ?[^cguz]ar
SFX R car qu?car
SFX R ar u?gar
SFX R ar ?[^g]uar
SFX R uar üé guar
SFX R zar c?zar
SFX R r ste ar
SFX R ar ?ar
SFX R r steis ar
SFX R r ron ar
SFX R 0 ?[aei]r
SFX R 0 ás [aei]r
SFX R 0 ?[aei]r
SFX R 0 emos [aei]r
SFX R 0 éis [aei]r
SFX R 0 án [aei]r
SFX R 0 ía [aei]r
SFX R 0 ías [aei]r
SFX R 0 íamos [aei]r
SFX R 0 íais [aei]r
SFX R 0 ían [aei]r
SFX R ar emos [^cguz]ar
SFX R car quemos car
SFX R ar uemos gar
SFX R ar emos [^g]uar
SFX R uar üemos guar
SFX R zar cemos zar
SFX R ar éis [^cguz]ar
SFX R car quéis car
SFX R ar uéis gar
SFX R ar éis [^g]uar
SFX R uar üéis guar
SFX R zar céis zar
SFX R 0 a ar
SFX R r se ar
SFX R 0 as ar
SFX R r ses ar
SFX R ar áramos ar
SFX R ar ásemos ar
SFX R 0 ais ar
SFX R r seis ar
SFX R 0 an ar
SFX R r sen ar
SFX R 0 e ar
SFX R 0 es ar
SFX R ar áremos ar
SFX R 0 eis ar
SFX R 0 en ar
SFX R r d [aei]r
SFX R r ndo ar
SFX R ar ándose ar
SFX R 0 se [aeií]r
SFX R er éis er
SFX R er ía er
SFX R er ías er
SFX R er íamos er
SFX R er íais er
SFX R er ían er
SFX R er ?er
SFX R er iste [^aeo]er
SFX R er íste [aeo]er
SFX R er i?[^aeo]er
SFX R er y?[aeo]er
SFX R er imos [^aeo]er
SFX R er ímos [aeo]er
SFX R er isteis [^aeo]er
SFX R er ísteis [aeo]er
SFX R er ieron [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeron [aeo]er
SFX R er iera [^aeo]er
SFX R er yera [aeo]er
SFX R er iese [^aeo]er
SFX R er yese [aeo]er
SFX R er ieras [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeras [aeo]er
SFX R er ieses [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeses [aeo]er
SFX R er iéramos [^aeo]er
SFX R er yéramos [aeo]er
SFX R er iésemos [^aeo]er
SFX R er yésemos [aeo]er
SFX R er ierais [^aeo]er
SFX R er yerais [aeo]er
SFX R er ieseis [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeseis [aeo]er
SFX R er ieran [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeran [aeo]er
SFX R er iesen [^aeo]er
SFX R er yesen [aeo]er
SFX R er iere [^aeo]er
SFX R er yere [aeo]er
SFX R er ieres [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeres [aeo]er
SFX R er iéremos [^aeo]er
SFX R er yéremos [aeo]er
SFX R er iereis [^aeo]er
SFX R er yereis [aeo]er
SFX R er ieren [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeren [aeo]er
SFX R er iendo [^aeoñ]er
SFX R er iéndose [^aeoñ]er
SFX R er yendo [aeo]er
SFX R er yéndose [aeo]er
SFX R r ndo ñer
SFX R er éndose ñer
SFX R ir ís ir
SFX R ir ía ir
SFX R ir ías ir
SFX R ir íamos ir
SFX R ir íais ir
SFX R ir ían ir
SFX R ir ?ir
SFX R r ste ir
SFX R r ?[^lñ]ir
SFX R r ?[^l]lir
SFX R ir ?llir
SFX R ir ?ñir
SFX R r steis ir
SFX R r eron [^lñ]ir
SFX R r eron [^l]lir
SFX R ir eron llir
SFX R ir eron ñir
SFX R r era [^lñ]ir
SFX R r era [^l]lir
SFX R ir era llir
SFX R ir era ñir
SFX R r ese [^lñ]ir
SFX R r ese [^l]lir
SFX R ir ese llir
SFX R ir ese ñir
SFX R r eras [^lñ]ir
SFX R r eras [^l]lir
SFX R ir eras llir
SFX R ir eras ñir
SFX R r eses [^lñ]ir
SFX R r eses [^l]lir
SFX R ir eses llir
SFX R ir eses ñir
SFX R r éramos [^lñ]ir
SFX R r éramos [^l]lir
SFX R ir éramos llir
SFX R ir éramos ñir
SFX R r ésemos [^lñ]ir
SFX R r ésemos [^l]lir
SFX R ir ésemos llir
SFX R ir ésemos ñir
SFX R r erais [^lñ]ir
SFX R r erais [^l]lir
SFX R ir erais llir
SFX R ir erais ñir
SFX R r eseis [^lñ]ir
SFX R r eseis [^l]lir
SFX R ir eseis llir
SFX R ir eseis ñir
SFX R r eran [^lñ]ir
SFX R r eran [^l]lir
SFX R ir eran llir
SFX R ir eran ñir
SFX R r esen [^lñ]ir
SFX R r esen [^l]lir
SFX R ir esen llir
SFX R ir esen ñir
SFX R r ere [^lñ]ir
SFX R r ere [^l]lir
SFX R ir ere llir
SFX R ir ere ñir
SFX R r eres [^lñ]ir
SFX R r eres [^l]lir
SFX R ir eres llir
SFX R ir eres ñir
SFX R r éremos [^lñ]ir
SFX R r éremos [^l]lir
SFX R ir éremos llir
SFX R ir éremos ñir
SFX R r ereis [^lñ]ir
SFX R r ereis [^l]lir
SFX R ir ereis llir
SFX R ir ereis ñir
SFX R r eren [^lñ]ir
SFX R r eren [^l]lir
SFX R ir eren llir
SFX R ir eren ñir
SFX R r endo [^lñ]ir
SFX R r éndose [^lñ]ir
SFX R r endo [^l]lir
SFX R r éndose [^l]lir
SFX R ir endo llir
SFX R ir éndose llir
SFX R ir endo ñir
SFX R ir éndose ñir
